North Carolina, session 2025, SB118.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. REDUCE CONCEALED HANDGUN FEES FOR CERTAIN VETERANS
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 14-415.19 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-415.19. Fees.
…
(a1) The permit fees for a retired sworn law enforcement officer who provides the
information required by subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection to the sheriff, in addition to
any other information required under this Article, are as follows:
Application fee ............................................................................ $45.00
Renewal fee ................................................................................. $40.00
(1) A copy of the officer's letter of retirement from either the North Carolina
Teachers' and State Employees' Retirement System or the North Carolina
Local Governmental Employees' Retirement System.
(2) Written documentation from the head of the agency where the person was
previously employed indicating that the person was neither involuntarily
terminated nor under administrative or criminal investigation within six
months of retirement.
The county finance officer shall remit the proceeds of the fees assessed under this subsection
to the North Carolina Department of Public Safety to cover the cost of performing the State and
federal criminal record checks performed in connection with processing applications and for the
implementation of the provisions of this Article.
(a2) The permit fees for a person who was discharged honorably or under general
honorable conditions from military service in the Armed Forces of the United States are the same
as for a retired sworn law enforcement officer under subsection (a1) of this section. In addition
to any other information required under this Article, an applicant claiming a reduced fee under
this subsection shall provide a Form DD-214 showing the applicant has been discharged
honorably or under general honorable conditions from military service in the Armed Forces of
the United States, a Veterans Identification Card issued by the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs, or other documentation (i) showing the person was discharged honorably or
under general honorable conditions from military service in the Armed Forces of the United
States and (ii) deemed satisfactory by the sheriff. The county finance officer shall remit the
proceeds of the fees assessed under this subsection in the same manner as proceeds remitted
under subsection (a1) of this section.
…."
*S118-v-5*

SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to
applications for concealed handgun permits and permit renewals submitted on or after that date.
PART II. PROVIDE ADDITIONAL TIME FOR MILITARY FAMILIES TO PROVIDE
PROOF OF RESIDENCY FOR PUBLIC SCHOOL ENROLLMENT
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-366(a9) reads as rewritten:
"(a9) A student who is not a domiciliary of a local school administrative unit shall be
permitted to register to enroll in the public schools of that unit by remote means, including
electronic means, prior to commencement of the student's residency in the local school
administrative unit if all of the following apply:
(1) A parent or legal guardian is (i) on active military duty and is transferred or
pending transfer pursuant to an official military order to a military installation
or reservation in the State.State or (ii) will be separating from active military
duty within a 12-month period.
(2) Upon request by the local school administrative unit where the student seeks
to register to enroll, a parent or legal guardian provides a copy of (i) the official
military order transferring to a military installation or reservation located in
the State.State, (ii) the official separation orders, or (iii) an official military
document showing the anticipated date of separation or date of projected
Permanent Change of Station to the State.
(3) A parent or legal guardian completes and submits the local school
administrative unit's required enrollment forms and documentation, except
that other than proof of residency and documentation related to disciplinary
actions pursuant to G.S. 115C-366(a4) shall not be required until the student
transfers into the local school administrative unit, at which time they shall be
required prior to commencing attendance.G.S. 115C-366(a4).
(4) A parent or legal guardian submits proof of residency and documentation
related to the disciplinary actions pursuant to G.S. 115C-366(a4) upon the
child commencing attendance. If the proof of residency has not yet become
available because the parent or legal guardian and child are residing in
temporary housing, the local school administrative unit shall do the following:
a. Allow the child to enroll and begin attending school in that unit of
anticipated domicile for a period of up to one year (i) from the parent
or legal guardian's reporting-for-duty date, separation date from active
military duty, or anticipated separation date from active military duty
or (ii) through the end of the school year before being considered a
resident of another local school administrative unit.
b. Allow a child who is a high school junior or senior to enroll and begin
attending school in that unit of anticipated domicile through high
school graduation.
A local school administrative unit shall make available to a student who registers to enroll
pursuant to this subsection the same opportunities available to a student enrolled
contemporaneously with domicilia, such as requesting or applying for school assignment,
registering for courses, and applying for any other programs that require additional request or
application. A student enrolled pursuant to this subsection may not attend school in the local
school administrative unit until proof of residency is provided in accordance with the
requirements of the local school administrative unit. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to curtail a local school administrative unit's authority pursuant to G.S. 115C-366(a5)."
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 Session Law 2025-72 Senate Bill 118

PART III. PROHIBIT DISCRIMINATORY ADMISSIONS POLICIES REGARDING
ACTIVE DUTY SERVICE MEMBERS AND VETERANS, REQUIRE MILITARY
ADMISSIONS DEFERMENT FOR CERTAIN PERSONS ADMITTED TO THE UNC
SYSTEM, AND PROVIDE IN-STATE TUITION TO CERTAIN HONORABLY
DISCHARGED VETERANS
SECTION 3.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 8A. Military Admissions and Deferment.
"§ 116-44.9A. Definitions.
For purposes of this Part, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Applicant. – An individual who has applied for admission to a constituent
institution of The University of North Carolina.
(2) Armed Forces. – The United States Air Force, Army, Coast Guard, Marine
Corps, Navy, Space Force, and North Carolina National Guard.
(3) Constituent institution of The University of North Carolina. – A constituent
institution of higher education of The University of North Carolina, as defined
in G.S. 116-2(4), excluding the constituent high school, the North Carolina
School of Science and Mathematics.
(4) Reserve Armed Forces. – The reserve components of any of the Armed
Forces.
(5) Uniformed service. – Any of the following:
a. Armed Forces.
b. Reserve Armed Forces.
c. The Merchant Marine.
"§ 116-44.9B. Nondiscriminatory evaluations of applications.
A constituent institution of The University of North Carolina shall not deny admission to any
applicant solely on the basis of the applicant's indication that the applicant is serving in the
uniformed service or that the applicant intends to serve in the uniformed service.
"§ 116-44.9C. Deferment.
(a) Deferment Requests. – The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina
shall adopt a policy requiring constituent institutions to provide for enrollment deferment for
members of the uniformed services and spouses of members of the uniformed services if the
deferment is requested at least 30 days prior to enrollment in a constituent institution.
(b) Deferment Periods. – Members and spouses of members of the reserve Armed Forces
shall be granted deferments of at least two years after entry into the reserve Armed Forces. All
other members and spouses of members of the uniformed services shall be granted deferments
of at least five years after entry into the uniformed services."
SECTION 3.(b) Article 14 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 116-143.3B. Tuition of qualifying veterans.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Armed Forces. – The United States Air Force, Army, Coast Guard, Marine
Corps, Navy, Space Force, the North Carolina National Guard, and any
reserve component of any of these entities.
(2) Qualifying veteran. – An individual who meets all of the following criteria:
a. Served active duty for not less than 90 days in the Armed Forces.
b. Received an Honorable Discharge from the Armed Forces.
c. Meets at least one of the following criteria:
1. Graduated from high school in North Carolina on or after
January 1, 2004.
Senate Bill 118 Session Law 2025-72 Page 3

2. Served active duty in the Armed Forces with a permanent
station in North Carolina for at least 90 continuous days.
3. Was awarded a Purple Heart.
(b) Any qualifying veteran admitted to an institution of higher education, as defined in
G.S. 116-143.1(a)(3), shall be charged the in-State tuition rate and applicable mandatory fees for
enrollment, without having to satisfy the 12-month residency requirement under G.S. 116-143.1.
(c) The individual applying for the benefit of this section has the burden of proving
entitlement to the benefit."
SECTION 3.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with the 2025-2026 academic year.
PART IV. REGULATE COMPENSATION FOR SERVICES RELATED TO
VETERANS' BENEFITS MATTERS
SECTION 4.(a) Article 14 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-1278. Compensation for services related to veterans' benefits matters.
(a) Definitions. – Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply
in this section:
(1) Compensation. – The payment of money, anything of value, or a financial
benefit.
(2) Veterans' benefits matter. – The preparation, presentation, or prosecution of a
claim affecting an individual who has filed or expressed an intent to file a
claim for a benefit, program, service, commodity, pension, function, or status,
the entitlement to which is determined under the laws and regulations
administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the
Department of Military and Veterans Affairs pertaining to veterans, their
dependents, their survivors, and any other individual eligible for such benefits.
(b) Prohibitions. – A person shall not do any of the following:
(1) Receive compensation for preparation, presentation, or prosecution of, or
advising, consulting, or assisting an individual with an initial disability claim
related to a veterans' benefits matter, except as permitted by this section.
(2) Receive compensation for referring an individual to another person to prepare,
present, prosecute, or advise, consult, or assist the individual with a veterans'
benefits matter.
(3) Directly or by implication guarantee or advertise that any individual is certain
to receive specific veterans' benefits or that any individual is certain to receive
a specific level, percentage, or amount of veterans' benefits.
(4) A person seeking to receive compensation for advising, assisting, or
consulting any individual with any veterans' benefits matter or engaging in the
preparation of an initial claim for a fee shall not:
a. Aggressively or directly solicit business regarding any veterans'
benefit matter.
b. Gain direct access to any personal medical, financial, or government
benefits login, username, or password information.
(5) A person seeking to receive compensation for advising, assisting, or
consulting any individual with any veterans' benefits matter shall not utilize a
medical professional for a secondary medical exam with whom they have an
employment relationship.
(6) Enter into any agreement related to a veterans' benefits matter that does not
comply with subsection (c) of this section.
Page 4 Session Law 2025-72 Senate Bill 118

(c) Memorialization of Terms. – Before rendering any services, a person seeking to
receive compensation for preparation, presentation, or prosecution of, or advising, consulting, or
assisting an individual with, a veterans' benefits matter shall memorialize all terms of the
agreement in a written agreement that complies with all of the following criteria:
(1) The written agreement is signed by both parties and contains all terms
regarding the individual's payment of fees for services rendered, including
both of the following:
a. Fees for services are contingent upon a successful outcome and shall
not exceed five times the one-month increase in benefits.
b. No initial fee shall be charged.
(2) The written agreement must clearly provide at the outset of the business
relationship the following disclosure: "This business is not sponsored by, or
affiliated with, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the
Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, or any other federally chartered
veterans' service organization. Other organizations, including, but not limited
to, the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, a local veterans' service
organization, and other federally chartered veterans' service organizations
may be able to provide you with this service free of charge. Products or
services offered by this business are not necessarily endorsed by any of these
organizations. You may qualify for other veterans' benefits beyond the
benefits for which you are receiving services here." This written disclosure
shall appear in at least 12-point font and shall appear in a readily noticeable
and identifiable place in the person's agreement with the individual seeking
services. This disclosure shall also be provided orally to the individual and the
individual shall verbally acknowledge understanding of the oral disclosure
and sign the document in which the written disclosure appears to represent
understanding of these provisions. The person offering services shall retain a
copy of the written disclosure while providing veterans' benefits services for
compensation to the individual and for at least one year after the date on which
the service relations terminate.
(d) Penalty. – A violation of this section is an unfair trade practice under G.S. 75-1.1.
(e) Exclusions. – Nothing in this section shall apply to attorneys who are licensed to
practice in the State of North Carolina."
SECTION 4.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025.
PART V. AUTHORIZE REMOTE DRIVERS LICENSE RENEWALS FOR ACTIVE
DUTY MILITARY AND THEIR FAMILIES
SECTION 5.(a) G.S. 20-7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-7. Issuance and renewal of drivers licenses.
…
(f) Duration and Renewal of Licenses. – Drivers licenses shall be issued and renewed
pursuant to the provisions of this subsection:
…
(6) Remote renewal or conversion. – Subject to the following requirements and
limitations, the Division may offer remote renewal of a drivers license or
remote conversion of a full provisional license issued by the Division:
a. Requirements. – To be eligible for remote renewal or conversion under
this subdivision, a person must meet all of the following requirements:
…
4. For a remote renewal, the most recent renewal was an
in-person renewal and not a remote renewal under this
Senate Bill 118 Session Law 2025-72 Page 5

subdivision.subdivision, except that an active duty member of
the Armed Forces of the United States or a reserve component
of the Armed Forces of the United States, who is stationed
outside of this State, and the member's spouse and dependent
children may remotely renew a license a second consecutive
time if either of the following applies:
I. The license being renewed is not REAL ID compliant
pursuant to the REAL ID Act of 2005, 49 U.S.C. §
30301.
II. The license being renewed is REAL ID compliant but
is being converted to a non-REAL ID compliant license
for purposes of the renewal.
…."
SECTION 5.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
licenses renewed on or after that date.
PART VI. CHILDREN OF WARTIME VETERANS SCHOLARSHIP FUNDS AWARD
FLEXIBILITY
SECTION 6.(a) For purposes of subsection (b) of this section, the following
definitions shall apply:
(1) Authority. – The State Education Assistance Authority.
(2) Commission. – The Veterans' Affairs Commission of the Department.
(3) Department. – The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.
(4) Program. – The program administered by the Department to award scholarship
funds that is referred to as Scholarships for Children of Wartime Veterans.
(5) Scholarship funds. – Scholarship funds awarded to the child of a North
Carolina veteran under Part 2 of Article 14 of Chapter 143B of the General
Statutes.
(6) Secretary. – The Secretary of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.
SECTION 6.(b) Notwithstanding Part 2 of Article 14 of Chapter 143B of the General
Statutes and any rules adopted or determinations made by the Veterans Affairs Commission, for
the 2024-2025 academic year and the 2025-2026 academic year, the following shall apply
relating to the administration of scholarship funds under the Program:
(1) Within funds available for the Program, the following shall be determined:
a. Due to the sacrifice of veterans for the State of North Carolina and the
unique needs and challenges of the children of wartime veterans to
ensure they have the greatest opportunities to reach their higher
education attainment goals, if there are additional eligible recipients,
other than those identified by the Department under this Program, who
are attending public colleges and universities of the State who may
qualify to have their scholarships funded with monies from the Escheat
Fund, the Authority, after consultation with the Secretary, may fund
those scholarships with monies from the Escheat Fund.
b. After consultation with the Authority, the Secretary shall determine
whether to prioritize the award of new applicants for the 2025-2026
academic year in Class I-A, I-B, and IV scholarships, prior to awarding
Class II and III scholarships. Class II and Class III awards may be
determined following awards for Class I-A, I-B, and IV depending on
the availability of funds for the Program.
c. The Secretary, after consulting with the Authority, may determine
based on the number of eligible students, including new and renewal
Page 6 Session Law 2025-72 Senate Bill 118

students, that have applied for the 2025-2026 academic year, whether
to reduce the room and board allowance award for students attending
a public institution and the maximum allowance award for students
attending private institutions, prior to August 15, 2025.
d. After the actions set forth in sub-subdivisions a., b., and c. of this
subdivision have been taken, for awards for the 2025-2026 academic
year, if funds available for the Program are still insufficient to provide
scholarships to all eligible students, the Authority may adjust and
standardize award amounts as necessary, including providing pro rata
scholarship awards for room and board, to ensure the efficient
administration of the scholarship funds.
(2) All scholarship notifications shall include language that the award of the
scholarship is contingent upon the availability of funds.
(3) The Authority shall disburse scholarship funds in accordance with
G.S. 116-204(11a).
(4) From the total amount of funding appropriated to the Board of Governors of
The University of North Carolina and allocated to the Authority in a fiscal
year to support the award of scholarship funds under the Program, the
Authority may use an amount of up to two and one-half percent (2.5%) for
administration costs related to the Program from the allocation from the
General Fund. The Authority shall place any unexpended and unencumbered
appropriated funds remaining at the end of the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026
fiscal years into an institutional trust fund established in accordance with the
provisions of G.S. 116-36.1. Those funds may be used for the purpose of
awarding scholarships under the Program and for administration costs of the
Authority related to the Program.
SECTION 6.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2025, and applies to awards
granted for the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 academic years.
PART VII. AUTHORIZE SHERIFFS TO SEND PERMIT EXPIRATION NOTICE VIA
EMAIL
SECTION 7.(a) G.S. 14-415.14 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) The permit application shall provide the permittee an option to consent for
communications related to the permit to be sent by electronic means to a designated electronic
mail address. The State Bureau of Investigation shall also create a separate paper form that a
current permit holder may submit to the sheriff to provide or revoke their consent for electronic
communications related to their permit."
SECTION 7.(b) G.S. 14-415.16(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) At least 45 days prior to the expiration date of a permit, the sheriff of the county where
the permit was issued shall send a written notice to the permittee explaining that the permit is
about to expire and including information about the requirements for renewal of the permit. The
notice shall be sent by first class mail to the last known address of the permittee. permittee or,
with consent of the permittee, by electronic means to a designated electronic mail address of the
permittee. Failure to receive a renewal notice shall not relieve a permittee of requirements
imposed in this section for renewal of the permit."
SECTION 7.(c) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Senate Bill 118 Session Law 2025-72 Page 7

PART VIII. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 8. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 30th day of June, 2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 9:39 a.m. this 9th day of July, 2025
Page 8 Session Law 2025-72 Senate Bill 118